Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.020

License required.

Any person who shall practice midwifery in this state after July 1, 1917, shall first obtain from the secretary a license so to do, and the said secretary is authorized to grant such license after examination of the applicant as hereinafter provided.

[ 1991 c 3 s 104; 1917 c 160 s 1; RRS s 10174.]